Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-142
Disciplinary action; failure of accused to appear and defend; hearing; order.

If, after having been served with the notice of hearing pursuant to section 1-141, the accused fails to appear at the hearing and defend, the board may proceed to hear evidence against him or her and may enter such order as is justified by the evidence, which order shall be final unless he or she petitions for a review as set forth in section 1-149, except that within thirty days from the date of any order, upon a showing of good cause for failing to appear and defend, the board may reopen the proceedings and may permit the accused to submit evidence in his or her behalf.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 37, p. 69;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 35.